Wyoming, session 2025, HB0023.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:
Section 1. W.S. 31-6-102(f), 31-6-104(b),
31-6-108(f), 31-7-113(e), 31-7-116, 31-9-105 and
31-9-106(a) are amended to read:
31-6-102. Test to determine alcoholic or controlled
substance content of blood; suspension of license.
(f) In addition to the signed statement submitted
under subsection (e) of this section, the peace officer
shall issue the person a temporary license similar to but
in lieu of the license authorized under W.S. 31-7-138.
This temporary license shall be valid for thirty (30) days,
shall not be renewed, shall contain a provide notice to the
person. The notice shall state that the person has twenty
(20) days from the date of issuance the notice within which
to request a hearing from the department and that failure
to timely request a hearing will result in the suspension
automatically commencing upon expiration thirty (30) days
after the date of the temporary license notice or upon
expiration the conclusion of any existing suspension or
revocation if the person's license or privilege is
currently suspended or revoked at the time the temporary
license is issued. W.S. 31-7-138(d) and (e) apply to a
1

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
license under this section peace officer provides notice.
For purposes of this section, the peace officer acts as an
agent for the department when providing notice of the
suspension and notice of the opportunity for a hearing.
W.S. 31-7-137 applies to a notice under this act. Failure
to demand request a hearing within the twenty (20) day
period is a waiver of the right of hearing, and the
suspension shall commence upon expiration of the temporary
license thirty (30) days after the date of the notice or
upon expiration the conclusion of any existing suspension
or revocation if the person's license or privilege is
currently suspended or revoked at the time the temporary
license is issued peace officer provides notice. If a
timely demand request for hearing is made, the department
shall forward the demand request to the independent hearing
examiner who shall schedule a hearing within forty-five
(45) days after receipt of the request from the department
and provide the arrested person at least ten (10) days
notice of the hearing. The hearing shall be conducted by
the hearing examiner. If the hearing examiner fails to
schedule the hearing within forty-five (45) days of the
request from the department, other than at the request of
the licensee person, the licensee person, as his sole
remedy, shall be given credit against any action upheld at
the hearing for the time between the expiration of the
forty-five (45) day period and the date the hearing was
first scheduled.
31-6-104. Right to petition for subsequent hearing;
suspension applies to all licenses held; persons not
required to take test.
(b) A suspension under this act applies to all
driver's licenses held by the person. and all driver's
licenses shall be surrendered to the department. The
2

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
department shall physically retain the license or licenses
during the period of suspension except as provided in W.S.
31-7-138(f).
31-6-108. Implied consent requirements for youthful
drivers.
(f) If a test discloses an alcohol concentration of
two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more, the
peace officer shall issue the person a temporary license
similar to but in lieu of the license authorized under W.S.
31-7-138. This temporary license shall be valid for thirty
(30) days, shall not be renewed, submit his signed
statement to the department. In addition to the signed
statement submitted under this subsection, the peace
officer shall contain a provide notice to the person that
the person has twenty (20) days from the date of issuance
of the notice within which to request a hearing from the
department pursuant to W.S. 31-7-105 and that failure to
timely request a hearing will result in the period of
suspension or license denial automatically commencing upon
expiration of the temporary license thirty (30) days after
the date of the notice or upon expiration the conclusion of
any existing suspension or revocation if the person's
license or privilege is currently suspended or revoked at
the time the temporary license is issued peace officer
provides notice. For purposes of this section, the peace
officer acts as an agent for the department when providing
notice of the suspension and notice of the opportunity for
a hearing. W.S. 31-7-137 applies to a notice under this
act. Failure to demand request a hearing within the twenty
(20) day period is a waiver of the right of hearing, and
the period of suspension or denial shall commence upon
expiration of the temporary license thirty (30) days after
the date of the notice or upon expiration the conclusion of
3

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
any existing suspension or revocation if the person's
license or privilege is currently suspended or revoked at
the time the temporary license is issued. A temporary
license issued under this subsection shall afford no
driving privilege to a person who is not otherwise licensed
to drive a motor vehicle peace officer provides notice. The
signed statement submitted by the officer under this
subsection shall contain:
(i) His probable cause to believe the person was
driving or in actual physical control of a motor vehicle:
(A) On a public street or highway in this
state;
(B) In violation of W.S. 31-5-234(b) or any
other law prohibiting driving under the influence as
defined by W.S. 31-5-233(a)(v).
(ii) That a test was taken of the person; and
(iii) The person had an alcohol concentration of
two one-hundredths of one percent (0.02%) or more.
31-7-113. Fees.
(e) Notwithstanding W.S. 31-7-131(c), If a driver's
license is reinstated after a period of suspension or
revocation, the fee for the reinstatement shall be fifty
dollars ($50.00) unless the final decision by the hearing
examiner, or a court reverses the action taken by the
department. If a driver's license is reinstated after
suspension for nonpayment of child support pursuant to W.S.
20-6-111 or 20-6-112, the fee for reinstatement shall be
not more than five dollars ($5.00).
4

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
31-7-116. Carrying and displaying.
Every licensee shall have his driver's license in his
immediate possession at all times when driving a motor
vehicle and shall display the license upon demand of any
judicial officer, municipal court judge, any officer or
agent of the division or any police officer as defined in
W.S. 31-5-102(a)(xxxiii). However, no person charged with
violating this section shall be convicted if he produces in
court a driver's license previously issued to him and valid
at the time of his arrest. For the purposes of this section
"display" of a physical license means the surrender of the
physical license to the demanding officer. After
examination the officer shall immediately return the
license to the licensee. except as provided in W.S.
31-5-1205(k). For purposes of this section, "display" of a
digital driver's license means that a licensee may provide
access to the digital driver's license on the licensee's
portable electronic device. No law enforcement or judicial
officer demanding display of a licensee's digital driver's
license for any licensing or identification verification
purpose shall take custody of the licensee's portable
electronic device. Display of a digital driver's license
shall not serve as consent to search the driver's portable
electronic device. Nothing in this section shall be
construed to require a person, other than the department if
it has chosen to issue a digital driver's license, to
accept a digital driver's license or otherwise require the
purchase of equipment to verify the accuracy of a digital
driver's license.
31-9-105. Return of registration to division.
5

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Any person whose license or registration is suspended under
this act, or whose policy of insurance or bond, when
required under this act, is cancelled or terminated, or who
neglects to furnish other proof upon request of the
division shall immediately return his license and the
registration to the division. If any person fails to return
to the division the license or registration as required,
the division shall direct any peace officer to confiscate
and return the license or registration to the division.
31-9-106. General penalties.
(a) Any person willfully failing to return a license
or registration as required in W.S. 31-9-105 shall be fined
not more than seven hundred fifty dollars ($750.00).
Section 2. W.S. 8-1-102(a)(xvii), 31-5-1205(k),
31-7-131, 31-7-133(a)(iv) and 31-7-138 are repealed.
Section 3. The department of transportation shall
promulgate rules as necessary to implement this act.
6

ORIGINAL HOUSE ENGROSSED
BILL NO. HB0023
ENROLLED ACT NO. 14, HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
SIXTY-EIGHTH LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WYOMING
2025 GENERAL SESSION
Section 4.
(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective July 1, 2025.
(b) Sections 3 and 4 of this act are effective
immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a
bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of
the Wyoming Constitution.
(END)
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
Governor
TIME APPROVED: _________
DATE APPROVED: _________
I hereby certify that this act originated in the House.
Chief Clerk
7